Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-807
Voluntary disclosure of call location
information.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of law to the contrary, nothing in the Kelsey Smith Act
shall prohibit a wireless carrier from establishing protocols by which the
wireless carrier could voluntarily disclose call location information.

Laws 2010, LB735, § 7.